Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1429YH (4) 91 jda/jh H.F. 149 Section 1. Section 279.10, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. An attendance center or school authorized to maintain 3 a year-round calendar must serve all students attending the 4 school and shall not be limited based on student achievement or 5 based on the trait or characteristic of the student as defined 6 in section 280.28 , Code 2024 . 7 Sec. 2. Section 280.28, subsection 2, paragraph b, 8 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 âHarassmentâ and âbullyingâ shall be construed to mean any 11 electronic, written, verbal, or physical act or conduct toward 12 a student which is based on any actual or perceived trait 13 or characteristic of the student and which that creates an 14 objectively hostile school environment that meets one or more 15 of the following conditions: 16 Sec. 3. Section 280.28, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 17 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 18